Utah statutes.
41-1a-1004.   Certificate of title -- Salvage vehicles.

(1)  If the division is able to ascertain the fact, at the time application is made for initial registration or transfer of ownership of a salvage vehicle, the title shall be branded:

(a)  rebuilt and restored to operation;

(b)  in a flood and restored to operation; or

(c)  not restored to operation.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), before the sale of a vehicle for which a salvage certificate or branded title has been issued, the seller shall provide the prospective purchaser with written notification that a salvage certificate or a branded title has been issued for the vehicle.

(b)  The requirement to provide written notification under Subsection (2)(a) does not apply if the prospective purchaser is:

(i)  a licensed motor vehicle dealer whose primary business is auctioning salvage motor vehicles to licensed salvage vehicle buyers; or

(ii)  an insurance company, if the sale of the vehicle is the result of a total loss settlement.

(3) (a)  An advertisement for the sale of a vehicle for which a salvage certificate or branded title has been issued shall disclose that a salvage certificate or branded title has been issued for the vehicle.

(b)  The advertisement disclosure under Subsection (3)(a) shall:

(i)  be displayed at least as prominently as the description of the advertised vehicle is displayed; and

(ii)  use the words "salvage certificate" or "branded title" in the advertisement.



Amended by Chapter 168, 2009 General Session

